Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.010

Divisions of department—Personnel.

The department of labor and industries shall be organized into divisions that promote efficient and effective performance of the duties the agency is charged by statute to administer.

The director may appoint such clerical and other assistants as may be necessary for the general administration of the department.

[ 1994 c 164 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 27 s 1. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 153 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 2; 1971 c 66 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 32 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.010; prior: (i) 1927 c 306 s 1, part; 1917 c 36 s 2, part; RRS s 8637, part. (ii) 1921 c 7 s 74; RRS s 10832.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 52: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 12.]